Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202481-3802
Commission; purpose.

The purpose of the commission is to join representatives of Asian Americans in Nebraska to do all things which the commission may determine to enhance the cause of Asian American rights and to develop solutions to problems common to all Asian Americans residing in Nebraska.

Laws 2024, LB1300, § 29.
July 19, 2024